New York, session 2025-2026, S7818.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 9 of section 677 of the county law, as added by 2 section 1 of part NN of chapter 56 of the laws of 2010, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 9. When required for official purposes of the state department of 5 health, the state commissioner of health or [his or her] their designee 6 may request copies of all reports and records related to a death, 7 including, but not limited to, autopsy reports and toxicology reports. 8 Upon receipt of the written request of the state commissioner of health 9 or [his or her] their designee, a coroner, coroner's physician or 10 medical examiner, shall, within three business days of their completion, 11 provide to such commissioner or [his or her] their designee a copy of 12 all reports and records, including, but not limited to, autopsy reports 13 and toxicology reports related to the death. For the purposes of this 14 section, the designee of the commissioner of health may include a local 15 health official. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10745-01-5